Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1741.03
Handicapped
parking infraction; citation form; Supreme Court; powers.

To insure uniformity, the Supreme Court may prescribe the form of
the handicapped parking citation to be used for handicapped parking infractions.
The handicapped parking citation shall include a description of the handicapped
parking infraction, the time and place at which the person cited is to appear,
a warning that failure to appear in accordance with the command of the citation
is a punishable offense, and such other matter as the Supreme Court deems
appropriate, but shall not include a place for the cited person's social security
number. The handicapped parking citation shall provide space for an affidavit
by a peace officer certifying that the recipient of the citation is the lawful
possessor in his or her own right of a handicapped or disabled parking permit and that the peace officer has personally
viewed the permit. The Supreme Court may provide that a copy of the handicapped
parking citation constitutes the complaint filed in the trial court.

Laws 1993, LB 632, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1211, § 10;

Laws 2002, LB 82, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB163, § 10.